Vermont, session 2025-2026, H553.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9452 is added to read:
§ 9452. HOSPITAL BUDGET DEVELOPMENT; PUBLIC HEARING
VT LEG #385631 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.553
2026 Page 2 of 4
(a) At least 30 days prior to submitting a proposed budget to the Green
Mountain Care Board for review under this subchapter, each hospital shall
hold a public hearing in one or more of the communities in its service area to:
(1) explain the proposed hospital budget under development for the
upcoming fiscal year, including explaining any services that the hospital
intends to add, reduce, or eliminate during the year; and
(2) provide meaningful opportunities for the public to provide input on
the proposal budget and changes in hospital services for the hospital to
consider as it completes its budget proposal.
(b) The hospital shall submit a summary of the public comments received
during the hearing or hearings, as well as copies of any written comments
submitted to the hospital regarding its proposed budget, to the Green Mountain
Care Board as part of the information required pursuant to section 9454 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9454 is amended to read:
§ 9454. HOSPITALS; DUTIES
(a) Hospitals shall file the following information at the time and place and
in the manner established by the Board:
(1) a budget for the forthcoming fiscal year;
VT LEG #385631 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.553
2026 Page 3 of 4
(2) financial information, including costs of operation, revenues, assets,
liabilities, fund balances, other income, rates, charges, units of services, and
wage and salary data;
(3) scope-of-service and volume-of-service information, including
inpatient services, outpatient services, and ancillary services by type of service
provided;
(4) utilization information;
(5) new hospital services and programs proposed for the forthcoming
fiscal year;
(6) costs associated with implementing their security plan pursuant to
section 1911b of this title, including capital investments, program operation,
and staff;
(7) known depreciation schedules on existing buildings, a four-year
capital expenditure projection, and a one-year capital expenditure plan; and
(8) a summary of the public input received by the hospital during the
public hearing or hearings held pursuant to section 9453 of this chapter, along
with copies of any written comments the hospital received on its proposed
budget; and
(9) such other information as the Board may require.
* * *
VT LEG #385631 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.553
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9456 is amended to read:
§ 9456. BUDGET REVIEW
* * *
(e)(1) The Board, in consultation with the Vermont Program for Quality in
Health Care, shall utilize mechanisms to measure hospital costs, quality, and
access and alignment with the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan,
once established.
* * *
(6) The Board may order one or more Vermont hospitals to align or
coordinate, or both, their administrative functions with one or more other
Vermont hospitals in order to maximize efficiencies and contain administrative
costs.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect passage.
VT LEG #385631 v.1